Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3315
License holder; judicial review; notice; effect.

If the license holder makes a timely request for judicial review after receiving a notice under section 43-3314, the court of competent jurisdiction as specified in subdivision (2)(e)(ii) of section 43-3314 shall have jurisdiction to hear the license holder's petition. Upon the timely notification by the license holder to the Department of Health and Human Services that the license holder is seeking judicial review as provided under this section, the Department of Health and Human Services shall stay the action to certify the license holder to the Department of Motor Vehicles and relevant licensing authorities as a license holder described in subsection (1) of section 43-3314 pending the outcome of judicial review.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 15.